District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Climate Commitment Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 109e of the District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of
2005, effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-176; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.09e), is
amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “and appliances by” and
inserting the phrase “and systems by” in its place.
(b) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Designate the existing text as paragraph (1).
(2) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “water-heating appliances that” and insert the phrase
“water-heating systems that” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “the appliance, except” and insert the phrase “the
system, except” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) This subsection shall not apply to the replacement of components of existing
space- or water-heating appliances that rely on the combustion of natural gas, oil, or other fossil
fuels at the site of the system.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of January 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia